Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Enterprise Zones [Repealed]

13-28-101 — 13-28-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 13-28-101 — 13-28-118 (Acts 1984, ch. 993, §§ 1-14; 1988, ch. 754, § 1; 1989, ch. 209, § 1; 1989, ch. 560, §§ 1-13; 1990, ch. 999, §§ 1, 2, 4, 8, 9; 1991, ch. 230, § 3; 1992, ch. 876, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 294, § 1; 1993, ch. 493, § 1; 1994, ch. 997, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 950, § 18), the Enterprise Zone Act of 1984, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 934, § 2, effective May 11, 1998, except for §§ 13-28-109 and 13-28-111, which were previously repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 560, §§ 16 and 17. Acts 1998, ch. 934, § 2 further provided that the enterprise zone management board was to terminate and cease all activities on May 11, 1998, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary.

Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 34, purported to amend § 13-28-103, effective June 17, 1999; however, that section was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 934, effective May 11, 1998.